District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-424

Property rights of partner — Specific partnership property; assignability; attachment or execution.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 641, Pub. L. 87-709, § 25
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 39, 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-124.
1973 Ed., § 41-324.